Louisiana, session 2026, HB263.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 13:589(E) is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§589. Fourteenth Judicial District Court; magistrate judge
* * *
E.(1) Notwithstanding this Section or any other provision of law to the
contrary, subject to the approval of the en banc judges of the Fourteenth Judicial
District Court, the magistrate judge may preside over a specialty court program and
fully adjudicate the related felony charges for those who have pled into or otherwise
agreed to participate in a specialty court program.
(2) For purposes of this Subsection, "specialty court" means any program
designated as a specialty court by the Louisiana Supreme Court including drug court
programs, Veterans Court programs, driving while intoxicated court, mental health
court, reentry court, domestic abuse court, behavioral health court, or any juvenile
specialty court handling matters related to allegations of domestic abuse.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 1 of 1
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.